District of Columbia statutes.
22-1308

Playing games in streets.

It shall not be lawful for any person or persons to play the game of football, or any other game with a ball, in any of the streets, avenues, or alleys in the City of Washington; nor shall it be lawful for any person or persons to play the game of bandy, shindy, or any other game by which a ball, stone, or other substance is struck or propelled by any stick, cane, or other substance in any street, avenue, or alley in the City of Washington, under a penalty of not more than $5 for each and every such offense.

History

July 29, 1892, 27 Stat. 325, ch. 320, § 17
Feb. 11, 1895, 28 Stat. 650, ch. 79

Cross References

Conduct of prosecutions under this section, see § 22-1809.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1108.
1973 Ed., § 22-1108.